Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-134
Gage.

The county of Gage is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township one, north, of range eight, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township six, north, of range eight, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township six, north, of range five, east; thence south along the range line, dividing ranges four and five, east, to the southern boundary line of the state; and thence east along the state line to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 22, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 847;

C.S.1922, § 749;

C.S.1929, § 25-136;

R.S.1943, § 22-134.